Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2302
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-2302 to 54-2324 shall be known and may be cited as the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 37.